Maryland, session 2025, HB0682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Aircraft” means any device used or designed for navigation of or flight in the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0682*

HOUSE BILL 682
air.
Article – Public Safety
3–534.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PERSISTENT AERIAL SURVEILLANCE” MEANS THE
USE OF AIRCRAFT, AS DEFINED IN § 5–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, TO
RECORD VIDEO OR A CONCURRENT SERIES OF IMAGES OR PICTURES THAT WHEN
VIEWED IN AGGREGATE DEPICT A PERSON’S ACTIONS OVER TIME.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A UNIT OR
AN AGENCY OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE MAY NOT
CONDUCT PERSISTENT AERIAL SURVEILLANCE TO GATHER EVIDENCE OR OTHER
INFORMATION IN A CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION.
(C) A UNIT OR AN AGENCY OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF
THE STATE MAY CONDUCT PERSISTENT AERIAL SURVEILLANCE:
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH A VALID SEARCH WARRANT ISSUED BY A
JUDGE;
(2) ON A LOCATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF EXECUTING AN ARREST
WARRANT;
(3) IN FRESH PURSUIT OF A SUSPECT, AS DEFINED IN § 2–304 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE;
(4) TO ASSIST IN AN ACTIVE SEARCH AND RESCUE OPERATION;
(5) TO LOCATE AN ESCAPED PRISONER;
(6) IF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER REASONABLY BELIEVES THAT
THE USE OF AIRCRAFT IS NECESSARY TO PREVENT IMMINENT SERIOUS BODILY
HARM TO AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
(7) IF THE UNITED STATES SECRETARY OF HOMELAND SECURITY
DETERMINES THAT CREDIBLE INTELLIGENCE INDICATES THAT THERE IS A HIGH
RISK OF A TERRORIST ATTACK BY A SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL OR ORGANIZATION AND
THAT PERSISTENT AERIAL SURVEILLANCE IS NECESSARY TO COUNTER SUCH A RISK.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.